Hawaii statutes.
§103D-206 Additional duties of the
administrator of the procurement office. In addition to the duties
referred to in section 103D-205, the administrator shall:

(1) Perform periodic review of the procurement
practices and procedures of all governmental bodies, in collaboration with the
state procurement policy board, for compliance with the procurement code;

(2) Assist, advise, and guide governmental bodies in
matters relating to procurement;

(3) Determine corrective actions; provided that if a
procurement officer under the jurisdiction of the administrator of the state
procurement office or a chief procurement officer of any of the other state
entities under section 103D-203, fails to comply with any determination
rendered by the administrator within thirty days from the date of the issuance
of the determination, or longer if permitted by the administrator upon request
by the procurement officer or a chief procurement officer, the procurement
officer or chief procurement officer shall be subject to an administrative fine
under section 103D-106, for every day of noncompliance;

(4) Develop and administer a statewide procurement
orientation and training program;

(5) Develop, distribute, and maintain a procurement
manual for all state procurement officials; and

(6) Develop, distribute, and maintain a procurement
guide for vendors wishing to do business with the State and its counties. [L Sp
1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 52, §3; am L 2005, c 166, §3; am L 2008, c
203, §1; am L 2016, c 253, §3]

Cross References

Procurement institute, see §304A-1352.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next